Hawaii statutes.
§445-234 Applicability. Any person
required to be licensed under chapter 289 or under section 445-171 shall not be
required to pay an additional fee under section 445-232; provided that such
person shall obtain the license required by section 445-232 and shall follow
the requirements of sections 445-232 and 445-233 when acting as a scrap dealer.
[L 1976, c 230, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next